Washington statutes.
RCW 9.45.020

Substitution of child.

Every person to whom a child has been confided for nursing, education or any other purpose, who, with intent to deceive a person, guardian or relative of such child, shall substitute or produce to such parent, guardian or relative, another child or person in the place of the child so confided, is guilty of a class B felony and shall be punished by imprisonment in a state correctional facility for not more than ten years.

[ 2003 c 53 s 29; 1992 c 7 s 9; 1909 c 249 s 123; RRS s 2375.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.